zh-CN: 印花工艺: 贴花/补丁; 成衣直喷 (DTG); 刺绣; 烫金印花; 夜光印花; 热转印/刻字膜; 胶浆印花; 发泡印花; 水钻/铆钉; 丝网印刷; 热升华; 水性油墨印花; 其他
cs: Technika tisku: Nášivka/záplata; Přímý potisk na textil (DTG); Výšivka; Potisk fólií; Svítící potisk; Nažehlovací / vinylová fólie; Plastisolový potisk; Puff potisk; Kamínky/cvočky; Sítotisk; Sublimace; Inkoust na vodní bázi; Ostatní
ko: 인쇄 기법: 아플리케/패치; 의류 직접 인쇄(DTG); 자수; 호일 인쇄; 야광 인쇄; 열 전사/비닐; 플라스티솔 인쇄; 발포 인쇄; 라인스톤/스터드; 스크린 인쇄; 승화 인쇄; 수성 잉크; 기타
fr: Technique de marquage: Appliqué / écusson; Impression directe sur vêtement (DTG); Broderie; Impression métallisée; Impression phosphorescente; Transfert thermique / vinyle; Impression plastisol; Impression gonflante; Strass / clous; Sérigraphie; Sublimation; Encre à base d’eau; Autre
tr: Baskı tekniği: Aplik / yama; Doğrudan giysiye (DTG); Nakış; Folyo baskı; Karanlıkta parlayan baskı; Isı transferi / vinil; Plastisol baskı; Kabarık baskı; Yapay elmas / zımba; Serigrafi baskı; Süblimasyon; Su bazlı mürekkep; Diğer
en: Print technique: Appliqué / patch; Direct-to-garment (DTG); Embroidery; Foil print; Glow in the dark print; Heat transfer / vinyl; Plastisol print; Puff print; Rhinestones / studs; Screen print; Sublimation; Water-based ink; Other
fi: Painotekniikka: Applikaatio/merkki; Vaatetulostus (DTG); Brodeeraus; Foliopainatus; Pimeässä hohtava painatus; Lämpösiirto/vinyyli; Plastisol-painatus; Kohopainatus; Strassit/niitit; Silkkipaino; Sublimaatio; Vesipohjainen muste; Muu
hu: Nyomtatási technika: Rátét / folt; Közvetlen textilnyomtatás (DTG); Hímzés; Fólianyomás; Sötétben világító nyomás; Hőtranszferes / fóliás nyomás; Plasztiszol nyomás; Térhatású (puff) nyomás; Strasszkövek / szegecsek; Szitanyomás; Szublimáció; Vízbázisú tinta; Egyéb
nb: Trykkteknikk: Applikasjon/lapp; Direct-to-garment (DTG); Broderi; Folietrykk; Selvlysende trykk; Varmetrykk/vinyl; Plastisol-trykk; Puff-trykk; Strass/nagler; Silketrykk; Sublimasjon; Vannbasert blekk; Annet
ja: 印刷技法: アップリケ / パッチ; ガーメントプリント (DTG); 刺繍; 箔プリント; 蓄光プリント; 熱転写 / ビニール; プラチゾルプリント; 発泡プリント; ラインストーン / スタッズ; スクリーンプリント; 昇華プリント; 水性インク; その他
es: Técnica de impresión: Aplique/parche; Directo a la prenda (DTG); Bordado; Estampado metalizado; Estampado que brilla en la oscuridad; Transferencia térmica/vinilo; Estampado con plastisol; Estampado con relieve; Pedrería/tachuelas; Serigrafía; Sublimación; Tinta a base de agua; Otro
el: Τεχνική εκτύπωσης: Απλικέ / μπάλωμα; Απευθείας στο ένδυμα (DTG); Κέντημα; Εκτύπωση foil; Φωσφορίζουσα εκτύπωση; Θερμομεταφορά / βινύλιο; Εκτύπωση πλαστιζόλ; Ανάγλυφη εκτύπωση; Στρας / τρουκς; Μεταξοτυπία; Εξάχνωση; Μελάνι με βάση το νερό; Άλλο
ru: Техника печати: Аппликация / нашивка; Прямая печать на ткани (DTG); Вышивка; Печать фольгой; Светящийся в темноте принт; Термоперенос / винил; Пластизольная печать; Объемная печать (Puff); Стразы / заклепки; Шелкография; Сублимация; Краска на водной основе; Другое
bg-BG: Техника на печат: Апликация / нашивка; Директен печат (DTG); Бродерия; Печат с фолио; Светещ в тъмното печат; Термотрансфер / винил; Пластизолен печат; Релефен печат; Камъчета / капси; Ситопечат; Сублимация; Мастило на водна основа; Друго
sl-SI: Tehnika tiska: Aplikacija/ našitek; Neposredni tisk na oblačilo (DTG); Vezenje; Tisk s folijo; Tisk, ki sveti v temi; Toplotni prenos/vinil; Tisk s plastisolom; Izbočen tisk (puff); Okrasni kamni/kovice; Sitotisk; Sublimacija; Črnilo na vodni osnovi; Drugo
sk-SK: Technika potlače: Aplikácia/nášivka; Priama potlač na textil (DTG); Výšivka; Fóliová potlač; Potlač svietiaca v tme; Nažehľovačka/vinyl; Plastizolová potlač; Puff potlač; Kamienky/cvoky; Sieťotlač; Sublimácia; Potlač farbami na báze vody; Iné
vi: Kỹ thuật in: Đắp giống / vá; In kỹ thuật số (DTG); Thêu; In ép nhũ; In dạ quang; Ép nhiệt / vinyl; In plastisol; In nổi; Đính đá / đinh tán; In lụa; In chuyển nhiệt; Mực gốc nước; Khác
de: Drucktechnik: Applikation / Patch; Direct-to-Garment (DTG); Stickerei; Foliendruck; Glow-in-the-Dark-Druck; Thermotransfer / Vinyl; Plastisoldruck; Puffdruck; Strasssteine / Nieten; Siebdruck; Sublimation; Tinte auf Wasserbasis; Sonstige
pt-PT: Técnica de impressão: Aplicação/remendo; Impressão direta no tecido (DTG); Bordado; Impressão foil; Impressão que brilha no escuro; Transferência de calor/vinil; Impressão a plastisol; Impressão em relevo; Pedras brilhantes/tachas; Serigrafia; Sublimação; Tinta à base de água; Outra
pl: Technika nadruku: Aplikacja / naszywka; Druk bezpośredni (DTG); Haft; Druk folią; Nadruk świecący w ciemności; Termotransfer / winyl; Druk plastizolowy; Druk wypukły (puff); Dżety / ćwieki; Sitodruk; Sublimacja; Druk farbami wodnymi; Inna
pt-BR: Técnica de estampa: Aplique/patch; Impressão direta no tecido (DTG); Bordado; Estampa metalizada (foil); Estampa que brilha no escuro; Transferência térmica/vinil; Estampa em plastisol; Estampa puff; Strass/tachas; Serigrafia; Sublimação; Tinta à base de água; Outra
sv: Tryckteknik: Applikation / märke; Direkt till klädesplagg (DTG); Broderi; Folietryck; Självlysande tryck; Värmeöverföring / vinyl; Plastisoltryck; Pufftryck; Strass / nitar; Screentryck; Sublimering; Vattenbaserat bläck; Övrigt
th: เทคนิคการพิมพ์: ปักปะ / อาร์ม; พิมพ์ลงบนผ้าโดยตรง (DTG); งานปัก; พิมพ์ฟอยล์; พิมพ์ลายเรืองแสง; รีดร้อน / ไวนิล; พิมพ์พลาสติซอล; พิมพ์นูน; เพชรเทียม / หมุด; สกรีน; ซับลิเมชัน; หมึกพิมพ์ฐานน้ำ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tehnica de imprimare: Aplicație / petic; Direct pe articol de îmbrăcăminte (DTG); Broderie; Imprimeu cu folie; Imprimeu fosforescent; Transfer termic / vinil; Imprimeu cu plastisol; Imprimeu în relief (puff); Strasuri / capse; Serigrafie; Sublimare; Cerneală pe bază de apă; Altele
hr-HR: Tehnika tiska: Aplikacija / zakrpa; Izravno na odjeću (DTG); Vez; Tisak folijom; Tisak koji svijetli u mraku; Termotisak / vinil; Plastisol tisak; Puff tisak; Cirkoni / zakovice; Sitotisak; Sublimacija; Boja na bazi vode; Ostalo
it: Tecnica di stampa: Applicazione / toppa; Stampa diretta su tessuto (DTG); Ricamo; Stampa foil; Stampa fosforescente; Trasferimento termico / vinile; Stampa plastisol; Stampa a rilievo; Strass / borchie; Serigrafia; Sublimazione; Inchiostro a base d'acqua; Altro
zh-TW: 印刷技法: 貼花/貼片; 數位直噴 (DTG); 刺繡; 燙金印花; 夜光印花; 熱轉印/膠膜; 膠印; 發泡印花; 萊茵石/水鑽; 網版印刷; 熱昇華; 水性油墨; 其他
nl: Druktechniek: Appliqué / patch; Direct-to-garment (DTG); Borduurwerk; Foliedruk; Glow-in-the-dark-opdruk; Hitteoverdracht / vinyl; Plastisoldruk; Puff-print; Steentjes / studs; Zeefdruk; Sublimatie; Inkt op waterbasis; Anders
da: Printteknik: Applikation/lap; Direct-to-garment (DTG); Broderi; Folieprint; Selvlysende print; Varmeoverførsel/vinyl; Plastisol-print; Puff-print; Rhinsten/nitter; Serigrafi; Sublimation; Vandbaseret blæk; Anden
lt-LT: Spausdinimo technika: Aplikacija / antsiuvas; Tiesioginė spauda ant drabužių (DTG); Siuvinėjimas; Spauda folija; Šviečianti tamsoje spauda; Terminis perkėlimas / vinilas; Spauda plastizoliu; Iškilioji spauda; Kristalai / kniedės; Šilkografija; Sublimacija; Vandeninis rašalas; Kita